Massachusetts, session 194th, H2279.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 8 of chapter 262 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out subsection (6) and inserting in place thereof
the following:-
for an attachment on mesne process of land or of any leasehold estate, $20 for each
defendant against whom an attachment is made, 65.5 cents a mile each way for travel from the
place of service to the registry, and his fee for the copy deposited in the registry of deeds or land
court, together with the recording fees actually paid;
SECTION 2. Section 8 of chapter 262 of the General Laws, is hereby amended by
striking out subsection (vi) of subsection (9) and inserting in place thereof the following:-
for travel, 65.5 cents a mile each way from the place where he receives the execution to
the office of the register of deeds, and his fee for the copy;
of 3

SECTION 3. Section 8 of chapter 262 of the General Laws, is hereby amended by
striking out subsection (19) and inserting in place thereof the following:-
for travel in the service of original writs, executions, warrants, summonses, subpoenas,
notices and other processes, 65.5 cents a mile each way, to be computed from the place of
service to the court or place of return; and if the same precept, or process is served upon more
than 1 person, the travel shall be computed from the most remote place of service, with such
further travel as was necessary in serving it; if the distance from the place of service to the place
of return exceeds 20 but does not exceed 50 miles, 65.5 cents a mile 1 way only shall be allowed
for all travel exceeding 20 miles and, if it exceeds 50 miles, only 15 cents a mile 1 way shall be
allowed for all travel exceeding that distance;
SECTION 4. Section 8 of chapter 262 of the General Laws, is hereby amended by
striking out subsection (20) and inserting in place thereof the following:-
for travel in the service of venires and notices to jurors, 65.5 cents a mile for the distance
actually traveled;
SECTION 5. Section 8 of chapter 262 of the General Laws, is hereby amended by
striking out subsection (21) and inserting in place thereof the following:-
for posting warrants, for notifying town meetings or for other purposes, $5 for each copy
posted together with 65.5 cents a mile for the distance actually traveled;
SECTION 6. Section 8 of chapter 262 of the General Laws, is hereby amended by
striking out subsection (3) of subsection (21) and inserting in place thereof the following:-
of 3

for service of a witness, summons, or subpoena in criminal cases, $20 plus travel in the
amount of 65.5 cents a mile each way for a distance of not more than 20 miles, and for any
excess over 20 miles, 15 cents a mile each way, and no more. The distance shall be computed
from the most remote place of service to the place of return, but upon a subpoena, the court shall
reduce the fee for travel to a reasonable amount for the service performed if the travel charged
has not been actually performed by the officer who made the service; and
of 3